Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-613
President; nominating petition; consent of candidate required; form of petition.

Any petition to place a person's name on the primary election ballot for President of the United States shall contain the names of not less than one hundred voters registered with the appropriate political party from each congressional district of the state, except that if the political party dissolves as provided in subsection (2) of section 32-720, the Secretary of State shall not accept a petition under this section. The name of the candidate for President shall be placed upon the ballot only when written consent of such person has been filed with the Secretary of State not less than sixty days before the primary election. The form of the petition shall comply with the requirements of sections 32-613.01 and 32-628 and shall as nearly as possible conform to the form prescribed by the Secretary of State. All signed petitions not filed with the Secretary of State shall become invalid if not filed not less than sixty days before the primary election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 181;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 59;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 31;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 39.